Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.050

Departments.

Each court may be organized in a manner consistent with the departments created by the districting plan.

[ 1984 c 258 s 6; 1971 c 73 s 2; 1961 c 299 s 5.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.